Washington statutes.
RCW 43.03.010

Salaries of elective state officers.

The annual salaries of the following named state elected officials shall be prescribed by the Washington citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials: Governor; lieutenant governor: PROVIDED, That in arriving at the annual salary of the lieutenant governor the commission shall prescribe a fixed amount plus a sum equal to 1/260th of the difference between the annual salary of the lieutenant governor and the annual salary of the governor for each day that the lieutenant governor is called upon to perform the duties of the governor by reason of the absence from the state, removal, resignation, death, or disability of the governor; secretary of state; state treasurer; state auditor; attorney general; superintendent of public instruction; commissioner of public lands; and state insurance commissioner. Members of the legislature shall receive for their service per annum the amount prescribed by the Washington citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials; and in addition, reimbursement for mileage for travel to and from legislative sessions as provided in RCW 43.03.060.

[ 1989 c 10 s 8. Prior: 1986 c 161 s 1; 1986 c 155 s 8; 1983 1st ex.s. c 29 s 3; 1979 ex.s. c 255 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 318 s 1; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 113 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 263 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 149 s 2 (Initiative Measure No. 282, approved November 6, 1973); 1967 ex.s. c 100 s 1; 1965 ex.s. c 127 s 4; 1965 c 8 s 43.03.010; prior: 1965 c 1 s 2; 1961 c 5 s 1; 1959 c 316 s 1; 1949 c 48 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 10965-1; prior: 1947 c 79 s .02.04; 1945 c 116 s 1; 1939 c 226 s 1; 1925 ex.s. c 163 s 1; 1925 ex.s. c 90 s 1; 1919 c 124 ss 1, 2; 1907 c 94 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1986 c 161 s 1: "Section 1 of this act shall take effect on January 1, 1987." [ 1986 c 161 s 3.]

Severability—1986 c 161: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1986 c 161 s 5.]

Contingent effective date—Severability—1986 c 155: See notes following RCW 43.03.300.

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 255: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1979." [ 1979 ex.s. c 255 s 11.]

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 318: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect on July 1, 1977." [ 1977 ex.s. c 318 s 7.]

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 263: "If any provision of this 1975 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1975 1st ex.s. c 263 s 7.]

Effective date—1975 1st ex.s. c 263: "This 1975 amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1975." [ 1975 1st ex.s. c 263 s 8.]

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 149 (Initiative Measure No. 282): "If any provision of this act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1974 ex.s. c 149 s 7 (Initiative Measure No. 282).]

Construction—1965 ex.s. c 127: "The salary increases provided for herein shall take effect at the earliest time allowable by the Constitution of the state of Washington, including Article II, section 13, Article II, section 25, Article IV, section 13, and Article XXVIII: PROVIDED, That it is the intent of the legislature that nothing in this act shall render a member of the legislature or of the judiciary ineligible to file for and be elected to the legislature or the judiciary respectively." [ 1965 ex.s. c 127 s 5.]

Salaries of elected officials: State Constitution Art. 28 s 1.

Washington citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials: RCW 43.03.305.